Washington statutes.
RCW 43.44.070

Examination of witnesses.

In the conduct of any investigation into the cause, origin, or loss resulting from any fire, the chief of the Washington state patrol and the director of fire protection shall have the same power and rights relative to securing the attendance of witnesses and the taking of testimony under oath as is conferred upon the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.03.070. False swearing by any such witness shall be deemed to be perjury and shall be subject to punishment as such.

[ 1995 c 369 s 30; 1986 c 266 s 73; 1985 c 470 s 23; 1947 c 79 s .33.07; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 45.33.07. Formerly RCW 48.48.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 470: See notes following RCW 43.44.010.